Utah statutes.
16-16-806.   Resignation of director.

A director may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the limited cooperative association.  Unless the notice states a later effective date, a resignation is effective when the notice is received by the association.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

